Washington statutes.
RCW 4.92.220

Risk management administration account.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1563-S2.SL) ***

(1) The risk management administration account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All receipts from appropriations and assessments shall be deposited into the account. Only the director or the director's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for expenditures.

(2) The risk management administration account is to be used for the payment of costs related to:

(a) The appropriated administration of liability, property, and vehicle claims, including investigation, claim processing, negotiation, and settlement, and other expenses relating to settlements and judgments against the state not otherwise budgeted; and

(b) The nonappropriated pass-through cost associated with the purchase of liability and property insurance, including catastrophic insurance, subject to policy conditions and limitations determined by the risk manager.

(3) The risk management administration account's appropriation for risk management shall be financed through a combination of direct appropriations and assessments to state agencies.

[2002 c 332 s 18; 1998 c 105 s 2; 1995 c 137 s 1; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 91; 1989 c 419 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2002 c 332: See notes following RCW 43.19.760.

Effective date—1998 c 105: See note following RCW 43.19.025.

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Intent—Effective date—1989 c 419: See notes following RCW 4.92.006.